Utah statutes.
63C-11-317.   Elimination contests -- Conduct of contests -- Applicability
of provisions -- Limitations on license -- Duration of contests -- Equipment
-- Limitations on contests.
(1)  An elimination unarmed combat contest shall be conducted under the
supervision and authority of the commission.
(2)  Except as otherwise provided in this section and except as otherwise
provided by specific statute, the provisions of this chapter pertaining to
boxing apply to an elimination unarmed combat contest.
(3) (a)  All contests in an elimination unarmed combat contest shall be no
more than three rounds in duration.
(b)  A round of unarmed combat in an elimination unarmed combat contest shall:
(i)  be no more than one minute in duration; or
(ii)  be up to three minutes in duration if there is only a single round.
(c)  A period of rest following a round shall be no more than one minute in
duration.
(4)  A contestant:
(a)  shall wear gloves approved by the commission; and
(b)  shall wear headgear approved by the commission, the designated commission
member, or the director if a designated commission member is not present.
(5)  A contestant may participate in more than one contest, but may not
participate in more than a total of seven rounds in the entire tournament.
